Utah statutes.
58-60-110.   Unprofessional conduct.

(1)  As used in this chapter, "unprofessional conduct" includes:

(a)  using or employing the services of any individual to assist a licensee in any manner not in accordance with the generally recognized practices, standards, or ethics of the profession for which the individual is licensed, or the laws of the state;

(b)  failure to confine practice conduct to those acts or practices:

(i)  in which the individual is competent by education, training, and experience within limits of education, training, and experience; and

(ii)  which are within applicable scope of practice laws of this chapter; and

(c)  disclosing or refusing to disclose any confidential communication under Section 58-60-114 or 58-60-509.

(2)  "Unprofessional conduct" under this chapter may be further defined by division rule.

